Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IX.] SEED CERTIFICATION

[§147-121] Official certifying agency. The
department is designated as the official certifying agency for certifying seed
concerning genetic purity, identity, quality, and condition for the State. The
department may appoint an appropriate agent to do the work necessary for the
certifications in compliance with established standards. [L 2003, c 49, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next